District of Columbia statutes.
7-2071.03

Program evaluation.

(a)

The Department shall develop criteria to be used in evaluating the performance of the Ombudsman Program.

(b)

(1)

The Department shall obtain, biannually, an independent evaluation of the Ombudsman Program through an academic group or other independent, private-sector organization, the Office of the Inspector General, or the Office of the District of Columbia Auditor. The evaluation shall take into account:

(A)

The number of consumer problems handled;

(B)

The success in resolving the consumer problems handled;

(C)

Outreach and community education activities;

(D)

Satisfaction of consumers served by the program; and

(E)

The extent to which information was provided to the public and policy makers about problems faced by the consumers served.

(2)

The Department shall decide whether to renew contracts based on the evaluation.

(3)

The evaluation shall be available to the public upon request.

(4)

The first evaluation shall take place no later than 2 years after April 12, 2005.

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-331, § 4, 52 DCR 1981